src/verb-sms-morph.txt
LEXICON LEED-PRS
 +Sg1:eäm		FINAL1	; !WG __ 
 +Sg2:eäk		FINAL1	; !WG ! __
 +Sg3:ij		FINAL1	; ! __
 +Pl1:eäˊp	FINAL1	; ! __
 +Pl2:%>eäˊped		FINAL1	; ! __
 +Pl2:%>eˊped		FINAL1	; ! __
 +Pl3:%>ie		FINAL1	; ! __
 +Pl3:%>iâ		FINAL1	; ! __
 +Pl3:%>ee		FINAL1	; ! __
 +4:%>eät FINAL1 ; ! 
 +ConNeg:eäk'ku FINAL1 ; ! 

! Past tense
! - - - - - - - -

LEXICON TEEVVAD-PRT
 +Sg1:%^VOWRaise%>um		FINAL1	; !đđ>dd ! _laullum_
 +Sg2:%^VOWRaise%>uk		FINAL1	; !đđ>dd ! _laulluk_
 +Sg3:%^VOWL%^CShort%>ai			FINAL1	; !WG ! _lääulai_
 +Pl1:%^VOWL%^CShort%>aim			FINAL1	; !WG ! _lääulaim_
 +Pl1:%^VOWL%^CShort%>ain			FINAL1	; !WG ! _lääulain_
 +Pl2:%^VOWL%^CShort%>aid			FINAL1	; !WG ! _lääulaid_
 +Pl3:%^VOWSH%^CLong%^VOWRaise%>u		FINAL1	; ! _laullu_
 +4:%^VOWRaise%>uš FINAL1 ;

LEXICON KALMMED-PRT
 +Sg1:%^PAL%>em		FINAL1	; ! _kâˊlmmem_
 +Sg2:%^PAL%>iǩ		FINAL1	; ! _kâˊlmmiǩ_
 +Sg3:%^VOWL%^CShort%^PAL%>i FINAL1	; !WG ! _tiõˊđi_
 +Pl1:%^VOWL%^CShort%^PAL%>im FINAL1	; !WG ! _tiõˊđim_
 +Pl2:%^VOWL%^CShort%^PAL%>id FINAL1	; !WG ! _tiõˊđid_
 +Pl3:%^VOWSH%^CLong%^VOWRaise%^PAL%>e FINAL1	; ! _kõˊlmme_
 +4:%^VOWL%^CShort%^VOWFront%^PAL%>eš FINAL1 ; ! vueˊlješ

LEXICON JURDDED-PRT
 +Sg1:%^PAL%>em         FINAL1  ; ! _juˊrddem_
 +Sg2:%^PAL%>iǩ         FINAL1  ; ! _juˊrddiǩ_
 +Sg3:%^VOWL%^CShort%^PAL%>i FINAL1     ; !WG ! _juuˊrdi_
 +Pl1:%^VOWL%^CShort%^PAL%>im FINAL1    ; !WG ! _juu´rdim_
 +Pl1:%^VOWL%^CShort%^PAL%>in FINAL1    ; !WG ! _juu´rdin_
 +Pl2:%^VOWL%^CShort%^PAL%>id FINAL1    ; !WG ! _tiõˊđid_
 +Pl3:%^VOWSH%^CLong%^VOWRaise%^PAL%>e FINAL1   ; ! _kõˊlmme_
 +4:%^VOWSH%^CLong%^VOWFront%^PAL%>eš FINAL1 ; ! ju´rddeš

LEXICON TIETTED-PRT
 +Sg1:%^PAL%>em		FINAL1	; ! _tiõˊttem_
 +Sg2:%^PAL%>iǩ		FINAL1	; ! _tiõˊttiǩ_
 +Sg3:%^VOWL%^CShort%^PAL%>i		FINAL1	; !WG ! _tiõˊđi_
 +Pl1:%^VOWL%^CShort%^PAL%>im		FINAL1	; !WG ! _tiõˊđim_
 +Pl2:%^VOWL%^CShort%^PAL%>id		FINAL1	; !WG ! _tiõˊđid_
 +Pl3:%^VOWSH%^CLong%^PAL%>e		FINAL1	; ! _tieˊtte, tiõˊtte_
 +4:%^VOWL%^CShort%^VOWFront%^PAL%>eš FINAL1 ; ! vueˊlješ

LEXICON TEEMEED-PRT
 +Sg1:%>eem		FINAL1	; ! _ääˊveem_
 +Sg2:%>iiǩ		FINAL1	; ! _ääˊviiǩ_
 +Sg3:%>ii		FINAL1	; !WG ! _ääˊvii_
 +Pl1:%>iim		FINAL1	; !WG ! _ääˊviim_
 +Pl1:%>iin		FINAL1	; !WG ! _ääˊviin_ ! sub??
 +Pl2:%>iid		FINAL1	; !WG ! _ääˊviid_
 +Pl3:%>ee		FINAL1	; ! _ääˊvee_
 +4:%>eeš FINAL1 ; ! ääˊveeš

LEXICON MAINSTED-PRT
 +Sg1:%>em             FINAL1  ; ! kåˊmrdem
 +Sg2:%>iǩ             FINAL1  ; ! kåˊmrdiǩ
 +Sg3:%>i              FINAL1  ; !WG ! kåˊmrdi
 +Pl1:%>im             FINAL1  ; !WG ! kåˊmrdim
 +Pl1:%>in             FINAL1  ; !WG ! kåˊmrdin
 +Pl1:%>iim             FINAL1  ; !WG ! kåˊmrdiim
 +Pl1:%>iin             FINAL1  ; !WG ! kåˊmrdiin
 +Pl2:%>id             FINAL1  ; !WG ! kåˊmrdid
 +Pl2:%>iid             FINAL1  ; !WG ! kåˊmrdiid
 +Pl3:%>e              FINAL1  ; ! kåˊmrde
 +4:%>eš FINAL1 ; ! kåˊmrdeš


! assuming stem _kåˊmQE1rd_
LEXICON KAMRDED-PRT
 +Sg1:%>em             FINAL1  ; ! kåˊmrdem
 +Sg2:%>iǩ             FINAL1  ; ! kåˊmrdiǩ
 +Sg3:%>i              FINAL1  ; !WG ! kåˊmrdi
 +Pl1:%>im             FINAL1  ; !WG ! kåˊmrdim
 +Pl1:%>in             FINAL1  ; !WG ! kåˊmrdin
 +Pl1:%>iim             FINAL1  ; !WG ! kåˊmrdiim
 +Pl1:%>iin             FINAL1  ; !WG ! kåˊmrdiin
 +Pl2:%>id             FINAL1  ; !WG ! kåˊmrdid
 +Pl2:%>iid             FINAL1  ; !WG ! kåˊmrdiid
 +Pl3:%>e              FINAL1  ; ! kåˊmrde
 +4:%>eš FINAL1 ; ! kåˊmrdeš

LEXICON LEED-PRT
 +Sg1:%>eˊjjem             FINAL1  ; !
 +Sg2:%>eˊjjiǩ             FINAL1  ; !
 +Sg3:%>eäi              FINAL1  ; !
 +Sg3:%>eei              FINAL1  ; !
 +Sg3:%>äi              FINAL1  ; !
 +Pl1:%>eeim             FINAL1  ; !
 +Pl2:%>eeid             FINAL1  ; !
 +Pl3:%>eˊjje              FINAL1  ; !
 +4:%>eˊjješ FINAL1 ; ! 
 +ConNeg:eäm'maž FINAL1 ; !
 +ConNeg:eäm'ma FINAL1 ; !
 +ConNeg:eäm FINAL1 ; !


! Imperative
! - - - - - - -
! teevvad
LEXICON TEEVVAD-IMP
 +Sg2:%^VOWL%^CShort FINAL1	; !WG
 +Sg3:%^VOWL%^CShort%>as			FINAL1	; !WG
 +Pl1:%>ap			FINAL1	;
 +Pl2:%>ad			FINAL1	;
 +Pl3:%^VOWSH%^CLong%>az		FINAL1	;
 +ConNeg:%^VOWRaise%>u FINAL1  ;
! 
LEXICON KALMMED-IMP
 +Sg2:%^VOWL%^CShort%^PAL FINAL1	; !WG
 +Sg3:%^VOWL%^CShort%>as		FINAL1	; !WG
 +Pl1:%>ep			FINAL1	;
 +Pl2:%>ed			FINAL1	;
 +Pl3:%^1VOWaz		FINAL1	;

!
LEXICON JURDDED-IMP
 +Sg2:%^VOWL%^CShort%^PAL FINAL1        ; !WG
 +Sg3:%^VOWL%^CShort%^VOWLower%>as                FINAL1  ; !WG
 +Pl1:%^PAL%>ep                      FINAL1  ;
 +Pl2:%^PAL%>ed                      FINAL1  ;
 +Pl3:%^VOWLower%>az          FINAL1  ;


! tieˊtted
LEXICON TIETTED-IMP
 +Sg2:%^VOWL%^CShort%^VOWFront%^PAL FINAL1	; !WG
 +Sg3:%^VOWL%^CShort%>as		FINAL1	; !WG
 +Pl1:%^PAL%>ep 		FINAL1	;
 +Pl2:%^PAL%>ed 		FINAL1	;
 +Pl3:%^PAL%>az		FINAL1	;

! teeˊmeed
LEXICON TEEMEED-IMP
 +Sg3:%>ââǥǥas		FINAL1	; !WG
 +Pl1:%>âkap			FINAL1	;
 +Pl2:%>eˊǩed		FINAL1	;
 +Pl3:%>âkaz		FINAL1	;

LEXICON MAINSTED-IMP
 +Sg3:%>ââǥǥas          FINAL1  ; !WG
 +Pl1:%>âkap                    FINAL1  ;
 +Pl2:%>eˊǩed           FINAL1  ;
 +Pl3:%>âkaz            FINAL1  ;


LEXICON KAMRDED-IMP
 +Sg3:%>ââǥǥas          FINAL1  ; !WG
 +Pl1:%>âkap                    FINAL1  ;
 +Pl2:%>eˊǩed           FINAL1  ;
 +Pl3:%>âkaz            FINAL1  ;

LEXICON LEED-IMP
 +Sg3:%>eäǥǥas          FINAL1  ; !WG
 +Pl1:%>eäk'kap                    FINAL1  ;
 +Pl2:%>eäk'ku           FINAL1  ;
 +Pl2:%>eäk'kveˊted           FINAL1  ;
 +Pl3:%>eäk'kaz            FINAL1  ;



! Potentialis & Konditionalis
! not including +Pot+Sg3
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

LEXICON VSUF-I-POTKOND
 POTENTIAL ;
 CONDITIONAL ;

LEXICON POTENTIAL
 +Pot+Sg1:žem FINAL1	;
 +Pot+Sg2:žiǩ FINAL1	;
 +Pot+Pl1:žep FINAL1	; ! How are these related?
 +Pot+Pl1:žim FINAL1	; ! Are there sub standards?
 +Pot+Pl1:žin FINAL1	; !
 +Pot+Pl2:žid FINAL1	;
 +Pot+Pl3:že FINAL1	;
 +Pot+4:žet FINAL1 ;
 +Pot+ConNeg:že FINAL1 ;

LEXICON CONDITIONAL
 +Cond+Sg1:čem FINAL1	;
 +Cond+Sg2:čiǩ FINAL1	;
 +Cond+Sg3:či FINAL1	;
 +Cond+Pl1:čep FINAL1	; ! How are these related?
 +Cond+Pl1:čim FINAL1	; ! Are there substandards?
 +Cond+Pl1:čin FINAL1	; !
 +Cond+Pl2:čid FINAL1	;
 +Cond+Pl3:če FINAL1	;
 +Cond+4:češ FINAL1 ;
 +Cond+ConNeg:če FINAL1 ;


! Suffix series II
! - - - - - - - -

! Other series
! - - - - - -


! Auxiliary verbs
! ---------------
